Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-804
Intercounty public library federation; establishment; board; members; terms; expenses.

(1) Upon the request of two or more local governing authorities within each of two or more adjoining counties, the county boards may jointly establish a public library federation.

(2) Each county board shall appoint two residents of the county to the public library federation board. At least one member from each county shall represent communities whose public libraries have affiliated with the federation. The members appointed by the county boards shall appoint an additional member. The members shall be appointed to broadly represent each county's population.

(3) Each member of the public library federation board shall serve a term of not less than three nor more than five years as jointly determined by the county boards, except that the terms of the initial appointments may vary in length so that terms will expire in a staggered fashion. If a vacancy exists in the membership from one of the participating counties, the unexpired term shall be filled by appointment by the appropriate county board.

(4) A member of the public library federation board shall not receive compensation for services rendered as a board member but may be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties from the public library federation fund.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 4.